Washington statutes.
RCW 19.122.170

Damage prevention account—Use of funds.

The commission may use money deposited in the damage prevention account created in RCW 19.122.160 to:

(1) Develop and disseminate educational programming designed to improve worker and public safety relating to excavation and underground facilities; and

(2) Provide grants to persons who have developed educational programming that the commission and the safety committee created pursuant to RCW 19.122.130 deem appropriate for improving worker and public safety relating to excavation and underground facilities.

[ 2011 c 263 s 13.]

NOTES:

Report—Effective date—2011 c 263: See notes following RCW 19.122.010.